Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.510

Crime information center—Files of general assistance to law enforcement agencies established—Runaway children—Information publicly available.

(1) As soon as is practical and feasible there shall be established, by means of data processing, files listing stolen and wanted vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifying children whose parents, custodians, or legal guardians have reported as having run away from home or the custodial residence, identifiable stolen property, files maintaining the central registry of sex offenders required to register under chapter 9A.44 RCW, and such other files as may be of general assistance to law enforcement agencies.

(2)(a) At the request of a parent, legal custodian, or guardian who has reported a child as having run away from home or the custodial residence, the Washington state patrol shall make the information about the runaway child as is filed in subsection (1) of this section publicly available.

(b) The information that can be made publicly available under (a) of this subsection is limited to information that will facilitate the safe return of the child to his or her home or custodial residence and so long as making the information publicly available incurs no additional costs.

[ 2013 c 4 s 4; 2010 c 229 s 4; 1998 c 67 s 2; 1995 c 312 s 45; 1967 ex.s. c 27 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2010 c 229: See note following RCW 13.32A.082.

Effective date—1998 c 67: See note following RCW 43.43.500.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.